Connecticut, session 2026, HB05174.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
That subdivision (4) of subsection (f) of section 4-66p of the general
statutes be amended to provide that four million dollars be paid for
reimbursement to the city of New London with respect to the United
States Coast Guard Academy annually for loss of taxes on private tax-
exempt property.